Utah statutes.
78B-6-301.   Acts and omissions constituting contempt.
The following acts or omissions in respect to a court or its proceedings are
contempts of the authority of the court:
(1)  disorderly, contemptuous, or insolent behavior toward the judge while
holding the court, tending to interrupt the course of a trial or other
judicial proceeding;
(2)  breach of the peace, boisterous conduct or violent disturbance, tending
to interrupt the due course of a trial or other judicial proceeding;
(3)  misbehavior in office, or other willful neglect or violation of duty by
an attorney, counsel, clerk, sheriff, or other person appointed or elected to
perform a judicial or ministerial service;
(4)  deceit, or abuse of the process or proceedings of the court, by a party
to an action or special proceeding;
(5)  disobedience of any lawful judgment, order or process of the court;
(6)  acting as an officer, attorney or counselor, of a court without
authority;
(7)  rescuing any person or property that is in the custody of an officer by
virtue of an order or process of the court;
(8)  unlawfully detaining a witness or party to an action while going to,
remaining at, or returning from, the court where the action is on the calendar
for trial;
(9)  any other unlawful interference with the process or proceedings of a
court;
(10)  disobedience of a subpoena duly served, or refusing to be sworn or to
answer as a witness;
(11)  when summoned as a juror in a court, neglecting to attend or serve, or
improperly conversing with a party to an action to be tried at the court, or
with any other person, concerning the merits of an action, or receiving a
communication from a party or other person in respect to it, without
immediately disclosing the communication to the court; and
(12)  disobedience by an inferior tribunal, magistrate or officer of the
lawful judgment, order or process of a superior court, or proceeding in an
action or special proceeding contrary to law, after the action or special
proceeding is removed from the jurisdiction of the inferior tribunal,
magistrate or officer.  Disobedience of the lawful orders or process of a
judicial officer is also a contempt of the authority of the officer.
